Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1242
Motorboat; fire extinguishers required.

Every motorboat shall be provided with such number, size, and type of fire extinguishers, capable of promptly and effectually extinguishing burning gasoline, as may be prescribed by the regulations of the commission, which fire extinguishers shall be at all times kept in condition for immediate and effective use and shall be so placed as to be readily accessible.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 42.